Massachusetts, session 194th, H1777.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17 of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “consanguinity”, in line 1, the
following words:-
“, affinity or adoption.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 1